Hawaii statutes.
[§485A-204] Denial, suspension, revocation,
condition, or limitation of exemptions. Except with respect to a federal
covered security or a transaction involving a federal covered security, an
order under this chapter may deny, suspend application of, condition, limit, or
revoke an exemption created under section 485A-201(3)(C), 485A-201(7),
485A-201(8), or 485A-202, or an exemption or waiver created under section
485A-203 with respect to a specific security, transaction, or offer. An order
under this section may be issued only pursuant to the procedures in section
485A-305(d) or 485A-604, and only prospectively. [L 2006, c 229, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next